New Jersey, session 221, S3700.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. A health care professional who engages in the dissemination of misinformation or disinformation shall be deemed to have engaged in professional misconduct in violation of subsection e. of section 8 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-21) and shall be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-14 et seq.). b.  Each board shall establish by rule or regulation: (1)  the general causes which constitute grounds for professional misconduct and disciplinary action pursuant to subsection a. of this section; and (2)  the appropriate disciplinary actions that may be taken against a health care professional based on the extent of the dissemination of misinformation or disinformation. c.  As used in this section: Board mean any professional or occupational licensing board designated pursuant to section 2 of P.L. 1978, c.73 (C.45:1-15) that licenses or certifies health care professionals in this State. Disinformation means misinformation that is deliberately disseminated with malicious intent or an intent to mislead. Disseminate means the conveyance of information, in the form of treatment or advice, by a health care professional to a patient under the health care professionals care. Health care professional means an individual licensed or certified to practice health care pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. Misinformation means any health-related claim of fact that is false and contradicted by contemporary scientific consensus contrary to the standard of care. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.